Hawaii statutes.
§92-3.5 Meeting by
interactive conference technology; notice; quorum. (a) A board may hold a
meeting by interactive conference technology; provided that the interactive
conference technology used by the board allows interaction among all members of
the board participating in the meeting and all members of the public attending
the meeting, and the notice required by section 92-7 identifies all of the
locations where participating board members will be physically present and
indicates that members of the public may join board members at any of the
identified locations.

(b)
Any board member participating in a meeting by interactive conference
technology shall be considered present at the meeting for the purpose of
determining compliance with the quorum and voting requirements of the board.

(c)
A meeting held by interactive conference technology shall be terminated when
audio communication cannot be maintained with all locations where the meeting
by interactive conference technology is being held, even if a quorum of the
board is physically present in one location. If copies of visual aids required
by, or brought to the meeting
by board members or members of the public, are not
available to all meeting participants, at all locations where audio-only interactive
conference technology is being used, within fifteen minutes after audio-only
communication is used, those agenda items for which visual aids are not
available for all participants at all meeting locations cannot be acted upon at
the meeting.

(d) Notwithstanding the
other provisions of this section to the contrary, a board member with a
disability that limits or impairs the member's ability to physically attend the
meeting may participate in a board meeting from a location not accessible to
the public; provided that the member with a disability is connected to other
members of the board and the public by both visual and audio means, and the
member identifies where the member is located and who, if anyone, is present at
that location with the member. [L 1994, c 121, §1; am
L 2000, c 284, §2; am L 2006, c 152, §1; am L 2012, c 202, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next